finished/ote.foma
source canonicalize.foma
def Alphabet [% |%(|%)|%-|a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z|%²|%¹|á|ä|ë|í|ï|ñ|ü|ʔ|ẹ|ọ|ụ|%'|%`|%’] ;
def Lemma Alphabet+ ;
	  
def Verb "[V]":0 ;
def RegularRules Verb [ ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga } |
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi } |
		 ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa }  |
		 ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:0    |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá }          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá }          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi }] Lemma ;

#Some get ʔ some get ʔñ this list may get update.
def LemmaGSN {ʔyo²}|{ʔyo²-mfọ}|{ʔyo²-mxu²di};
def RulesGSN Verb [["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		  ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí } |
		  ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí }  |
		  ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí }  |
		  ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí }  |
    	     	  ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá ʔñ}|
		  ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká ʔñ}|
		  ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa ʔñ} |
		  ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí ʔñ}       |
		  ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí ʔñ}       |
		  ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki ʔñ}       |
		  ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga ʔñ}	 |
		  ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi ʔñ} 	 |
		  ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da ʔñ} 	 |
		  ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá ʔñ}         |
		  ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá ʔñ}         |
		  ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi ʔñ}] LemmaGSN ;

#These lemmas get a ʔy
def LemmaGSY {ai}|{aki}|
{ani}|{at’i}|{e¹²st’e}|{ẹi}|{ẹni}|{ẹt’i}|{o¹²}|{ọ²ke}|
{o²t’i}|{ọ²ʔtse}|{o²ts’i}|{ofo}|{ọt’a²-hu¹²di}|
{ọte}|{ọt’e}|{ọthe}|{u¹²ts’i}|{ụ¹²ts’i}|{ʔyo²}|{ʔyo²-mfọ}|{ʔyo²-mxu²di} ;
def RulesGSY Verb [["[IPFV]""[SG]""[1]""[PRS]"]:{dí ʔy}    |
    	     	   ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí ʔy}|
		   ["[IPFV]""[SG]""[2]""[PRS]"]:{gí ʔy}    |
		   ["[IPFV]""[SG]""[2]""[PST]"]:{ngí ʔy}   |
		   ["[IPFV]""[SG]""[3]""[PST]"]:{mí ʔy}    |
		   ["[IRR]""[SG]""[1]"]:{ga ʔy}            |
		   ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi ʔy}          |
		   ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da ʔy}          |
		   ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá ʔy}          |
		   ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá ʔy}          |
		   ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi ʔy}          |
		   ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí ʔy}       |
		   ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí ʔy}       |
		   ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki ʔy}        |
		   ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá ʔy} |
		   ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká ʔy} |
		   ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa ʔy}] LemmaGSY ;

#These onlt get a ʔ. This will probably update.
def LemmasGSonly {ä¹²ni}|{ä¹²st’i}|{a²k-hñu²ni}|{a²k-sei}|{a²spi}|{ä²t’i}|{a²xa²-hai}|{a²yu²nä}|{ai}|{aki}|{ambi}|{ani}|{änt’i}|{at’i}|{ät’i}|{ats’i}|{e¹²ni}|{e¹²n-sẹ}|{e¹²nthi}|{e¹²st’e}|{e¹²tsua}|{ẹi}|{ẹt’i}|{ẹʔtsi}|{i¹²gi}|{i¹²ni}|{i¹²t’i}|{i¹²xki}|{i²}|{i²nga²-du²tu}|{it’i}|{jua²-sẹ¹²hẹ}|{kue²ke}|{o¹²}|{o²di}|{ọ²ke}|{ọ²t’a²-do¹²ndo}|{ọ²t’a²-ge¹²rra}|{ọ²t’a²-nde²he}|{ọ²te}|{o²t’i}|{ọ²ʔtse}|{ọ²ts’e}|{o²ts’i}|{ofo}|{oki}|{ọt’a²-hu¹²di}|{ọte}|{ọt’e}|{ọthe}|{oʔtsi}|{u¹²ni}|{ụ¹²ni}|{ụ¹²-tsa}|{u¹²ts’i}|{ụ¹²ts’i}|{ụ²}|{u²di}|{u²nga²-ngüẹ¹²nda}|{u²nga²-nt’ọde}|{u²ni}|{ụ²-ʔta}|{u²t’a²-nä¹²ni}|{u²ti}|{u²ʔti}|{u²ʔtsi}|{ugi}|{ut’i} ;

def RulesGSonly Verb [["[IPFV]""[SG]""[1]""[PRS]"]:{dí ʔ} |
    		     ["[IPFV]""[SG]""[3]""[PRS]"]:{ʔ}     |
    	     	   ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí ʔ}|
		   ["[IPFV]""[SG]""[2]""[PRS]"]:{gí ʔ}    |
		   ["[IPFV]""[SG]""[2]""[PST]"]:{ngí ʔ}   |
		   ["[IPFV]""[SG]""[3]""[PST]"]:{mí ʔ}    |
		   ["[IRR]""[SG]""[1]"]:{ga ʔ}            |
		   ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi ʔ}          |
		   ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da ʔ}          |
		   ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá ʔ}          |
		   ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá ʔ}          |
		   ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi ʔ}          |
		   ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí ʔ}        |
		   ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí ʔ}        |
		   ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki ʔ}        |
		   ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá ʔ} |
		   ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká ʔ} |
		   ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa ʔ}] LemmasGSonly ;

def SpecLemmaVowelChange1 {ʔñe²he} ;
def SpecLemma1Fix SpecLemma1 -> ʔñëhë ;
def SpecLemmaVChangeRules1 Verb [["[PFV]""[SG]""[2]"]:{gá }|
    		      ["[IPFV]""[SG]""[1]""[PRS]"]:{dí }   |
		      ["[IPFV]""[SG]""[2]""[PRS]"]:{gí }   |
		      ["[IPFV]""[SG]""[2]""[PST]"]:{ngí }  |
		      ["[IPFV]""[SG]""[3]""[PST]"]:{mí }   |
		      ["[PRF]""[SG]""[1]""[PRS]"]:{stá }   |
		      ["[PRF]""[SG]""[2]""[PRS]"]:{xká }   |
		      ["[PRF]""[SG]""[3]""[PRS]"]:{xa }    |
		      ["[PRF]""[1]""[PST]"]:{stí }    	   |
		      ["[IRR]""[SG]""[1]"]:{ga }	   |
		      ["[IRR]""[SG]""[3]"]:{da }] SpecLemmaVowelChange1 .o. SpecLemmaVChange1 ;

#Some get ʔ some get ʔy
def SpecLemmaVowelStartMixGS1 {a} | {a²xa²-hai} | {a²yu²nä} | {ai} | {aki} | {ambi} | {ani} | {at’i} | {ats’i} | {ets’e} ;

def SpecLemmaVowelStartMixGSRules1 Verb
    		 [["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga ʔ} |
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi ʔy} |
		 ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da ʔy} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá ʔ} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká ʔy} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa ʔy}  |
		 ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí ʔ} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí ʔy} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki ʔy} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí ʔ}|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí ʔ}|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí ʔ} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí ʔ} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí ʔ} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{ʔ}    |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá ʔ}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá ʔy}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi ʔy}] SpecLemmaVowelStartMixGS1 ;

#Some get ʔ some get ʔñ if the lemma starts with e it'll change to ë 
def SpecLemmaVowelChange2 {a²k-hñu²ni}|
{a²spi}|{e¹²mbi}  ;

def eFix e -> ë || .#. (?) (?) (?) " " [ʔ | {ʔñ}] _ ;
def SpecLemmaVowelStartMixGSRules2 Verb
    		 [ ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga ʔ}	|
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi ʔñ}    	|
		 ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da ʔñ}		|
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá ʔ} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká ʔñ}|
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa ʔñ} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí ʔ}        |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí ʔñ}       |
		 ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki ʔñ}       |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí ʔ}|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí ʔ}|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí ʔ} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí ʔ} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí ʔ} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{ʔ}    |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá ʔ}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá ʔñ}         |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi ʔñ}] SpecLemmaVowelChange2 .o. eFix ;

#Som get ʔ some get ʔy but different than SpecLemmaVowelStartMixGS1
def SpecLemmaVowelStartMixGS2 {ehni} | {ent’i} | {e²ke} | {e¹²ʔtse} ;
def SpecLemmaVowelStartMixGSRules3 Verb
    		 [["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga ʔ} |
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi ʔy} |
		 ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da ʔy} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá ʔ} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká ʔy} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa ʔy}  |
		 ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí ʔ} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí ʔ} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki ʔy} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí ʔ}|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí ʔ}|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí ʔ} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí ʔ} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí ʔ} |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{ʔ}    |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá ʔ}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá ʔy}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi ʔy}] SpecLemmaVowelStartMixGS2 ;


#These get an n added to the lemma
def addNLemmas {the²-sẹ¹²hẹ} | {the²de} | {the²n-the} | {thi²ʔtsi} |
{xa²n-the} | {xa²s-te} | {xadi} | {xi²s-te¹²he} | {xo²fo} |{xo²s-thu¹²hu} | {xụ²-ʔyẹ} | {xuni} ;
def AddN Verb [["[IRR]""[SG]""[1]"]:{ga n} 	     |
    	      ["[IRR]""[SG]""[2]"]:{gi n}            |
	      ["[IRR]""[SG]""[3]"]:{da n}            |
	      ["[PFV]""[SG]""[1]"]:{dá n}            |
	      ["[PFV]""[SG]""[2]"]:{gá n}            |
	      ["[PFV]""[SG]""[3]"]:{bi n}            |
	      ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí n} 	     |
	      ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí n} 	     |
	      ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki n}	     |
	      ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá n} |
	      ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká n} |
	      ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa n}] addNLemmas ;

#These have some nhy starts. One set will be regular one will be nhy
def hTOnhyLemmas {ha²ha}|{ha²-ne}|{ha²-ne} | {ha²-te} | {has-tai} | {he²he} |
{hẹ²ka²-ndäpo} | {hẹ²n-the} | {hẹ²n-za} | {he²ts’e} |{hi} | {họ²-ndgu} |
{họ²ndri} |{ho²nga²-ʔyo} |{ho²-te} |{họ²x-gi²ni} |{họ²x-yä} |{ho²-ʔyo} |{hya} |{hya²ʔnga} |{hyo²-ya} ;


def notNHY Verb [
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:0] hTOnhyLemmas ;


def hFix h -> nhy || .#. (?) (?) (?) " " _ ;
def addNHY Verb   [
    	     	  ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá }|
		  ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká }|
		  ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa } |
		  ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí }       |
		  ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí }       |
		  ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki }       |
		  ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga }	 |
		  ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi } 	 |
		  ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da } 	 |
		  ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá }         |
		  ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá }         |
		  ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi }] hTOnhyLemmas .o. hFix ;


def tLemmas {tä¹²}|{ta¹²ha}|{tä¹²hä}|{tä¹²ki}|{ta²gi}|{ta²ki}|{ta²st’i}|{tai}|{taki}|{täki}|{tänt’i}|{tẹ}|{te¹²ge}|
{tẹ¹²hẹ}|{tẹ¹²xi}|{te²hmi}|{tẹ²ʔmi}|{tẹ²ni}|{tẹ²t’i}|{teke}|{tet’e}|{tets’e}|{thädi}|{thani}|{that’i}|
{thät’i}|{thẹki}|{thẹ-nde}|{theni}|{thẹts’i}|{thi¹²nt’i}|{thi²ts’i}|{thini}|{thọge}|{thoki}|{thont’i}|
{thoʔti}|{thụni}|{thuts’i}|{thuui}|{ti¹²ni}|{ti¹²ts’i}|{ti²ki}|{ti²ʔti}|{to¹²nts’i}|{tọ¹²t’e}|{to²ki}|
{tọ²ʔmi}|{to²ʔti}|{to²t’i}|{tọ²ʔtse}|{toʔmi}|{tu}|{tu¹²}|{tụ¹²ni}|{tu¹²ti}|{tu¹²ts’i}|{tu²ki}|{tụ²ki}|
{tu²ʔti}|{tụ²ʔtsi}|{tụhụ}|{tut’i}|{tuʔtsi} ;

def tLemmasRegular Verb [ ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga } |
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:0    |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá }          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá }]  tLemmas ;

def tTOdFix [t|t h] -> d || .#. (?) (?) (?) " " _ ;
def tTOdRules Verb [["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da }|
["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki }|
["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa }|
["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi }] tLemmas .o. tTOdFix ;

#Some paradigms the k changes to g

def kTOgLemmas {kä¹²}|{kä¹²xi}|{kä²i}|{kä²ki}|{ka²mfri}|{kä²ʔmi}|{kä²t’i}|{kai}|{kat’i}|{kät’i}|{kaʔtsi}|{kats’i}|{käts’i}|{kọ¹²st’e}|{ko¹²st’i}|{ko¹²ts’i}| {ko²ti} | {{kọ¹²xke}|{kọ²de}|{ko²hi}|{ko²ʔmi}|{ko²t’i}|{koh-wi}|{kọni}|{koʔtsi}|{kụ¹²hni}|{kụ¹²ts’i}|{kụi}|{kụni}|{kunt’ẹi}|{kuui} ;
